Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2155.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 5 heading of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:CHAPTER 5[PROHIBITION OPTIONS] MUNICIPAL PROHIBITIONSSection 2. Chapter 5 of Title 53 is amended by adding a subchapter heading immediately after the Chapter 5 heading to read:SUBCHAPTER APROHIBITION OPTIONS RELATING TO GAMINGSection 3. Chapter 5 of Title 53 is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER B123456789101112131415161718 OTHER PROHIBITIONSSec.511. Parking minimums.§ 511. Parking minimums.Except as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336, 104 Stat. 327), a county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, home rule municipality, optional plan municipality or optional charter municipality in this Commonwealth may not require a minimum number of vehicular parking spaces per land development or structure, as those terms are defined in section 107 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, regardless of occupancy or use.Section 4. This act shall take effect in one year.20260HB2155PN2789 - 2 - 1234567891011121314